6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX c1 Y 384
SFX c1 r r/n'q'd' er po:infi
SFX c1 er ant/n'q' [^cg]er po:ppre
SFX c1 écer éçant/n'q' écer po:ppre
SFX c1 éger égeant/n'q' éger po:ppre
SFX c1 ébrer èbre/n'q'j' ébrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 écer èce/n'q'j' écer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 écher èche/n'q'j' écher po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 écrer ècre/n'q'j' écrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éder ède/n'q'j' éder po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éger ège/n'q'j' éger po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 égler ègle/n'q'j' égler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 égner ègne/n'q'j' égner po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 égrer ègre/n'q'j' égrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éguer ègue/n'q'j' éguer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éler èle/n'q'j' éler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 émer ème/n'q'j' émer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éner ène/n'q'j' éner po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éper èpe/n'q'j' éper po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 équer èque/n'q'j' équer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 érer ère/n'q'j' érer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éser èse/n'q'j' éser po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éter ète/n'q'j' éter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 étrer ètre/n'q'j' étrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 évrer èvre/n'q'j' évrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 éyer èye/n'q'j' éyer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c1 er è/n' er po:ipre po:1isg
SFX c1 ébrer èbres/n' ébrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 écer èces/n' écer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 écher èches/n' écher po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 écrer ècres/n' écrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éder èdes/n' éder po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éger èges/n' éger po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 égler ègles/n' égler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 égner ègnes/n' égner po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 égrer ègres/n' égrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éguer ègues/n' éguer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éler èles/n' éler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 émer èmes/n' émer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éner ènes/n' éner po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éper èpes/n' éper po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 équer èques/n' équer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 érer ères/n' érer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éser èses/n' éser po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éter ètes/n' éter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 étrer ètres/n' étrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 évrer èvres/n' évrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 éyer èyes/n' éyer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c1 er ons/n' [^cg]er po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c1 écer éçons/n' écer po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c1 éger égeons/n' éger po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c1 er ez/n' er po:ipre po:2pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbrent/n'q' ébrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 écer ècent/n'q' écer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 écher èchent/n'q' écher po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 écrer ècrent/n'q' écrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éder èdent/n'q' éder po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éger ègent/n'q' éger po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 égler èglent/n'q' égler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 égner ègnent/n'q' égner po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 égrer ègrent/n'q' égrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éguer èguent/n'q' éguer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éler èlent/n'q' éler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 émer èment/n'q' émer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éner ènent/n'q' éner po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éper èpent/n'q' éper po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 équer èquent/n'q' équer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 érer èrent/n'q' érer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éser èsent/n'q' éser po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éter ètent/n'q' éter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 étrer ètrent/n'q' étrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 évrer èvrent/n'q' évrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 éyer èyent/n'q' éyer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c1 er ais/n'j' [^cg]er po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c1 écer éçais/n'j' écer po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c1 éger égeais/n'j' éger po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c1 er ait/n'q' [^cg]er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c1 écer éçait/n'q' écer po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c1 éger égeait/n'q' éger po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c1 er ions/n' er po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX c1 er iez/n' er po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX c1 er aient/n'q' [^cg]er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c1 écer éçaient/n'q' écer po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c1 éger égeaient/n'q' éger po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c1 er ai/n'j' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c1 écer éçai/n'j' écer po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c1 éger égeai/n'j' éger po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c1 er as/n' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c1 écer éças/n' écer po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c1 éger égeas/n' éger po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c1 er a/n'q' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c1 écer éça/n'q' écer po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c1 éger égea/n'q' éger po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c1 er âmes/n' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c1 écer éçâmes/n' écer po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c1 éger égeâmes/n' éger po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c1 er âtes/n' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c1 écer éçâtes/n' écer po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c1 éger égeâtes/n' éger po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c1 er èrent/n'q' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX c1 er erai/n'j' er po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerai/n'j' ébrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 écer ècerai/n'j' écer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 écher ècherai/n'j' écher po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 écrer ècrerai/n'j' écrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éder èderai/n'j' éder po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éger ègerai/n'j' éger po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 égler èglerai/n'j' égler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 égner ègnerai/n'j' égner po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 égrer ègrerai/n'j' égrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éguer èguerai/n'j' éguer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éler èlerai/n'j' éler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 émer èmerai/n'j' émer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éner ènerai/n'j' éner po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éper èperai/n'j' éper po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 équer èquerai/n'j' équer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 érer èrerai/n'j' érer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éser èserai/n'j' éser po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éter èterai/n'j' éter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 étrer ètrerai/n'j' étrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 évrer èvrerai/n'j' évrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 éyer èyerai/n'j' éyer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c1 er eras/n' er po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 ébrer èbreras/n' ébrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 écer èceras/n' écer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 écher ècheras/n' écher po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 écrer ècreras/n' écrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éder èderas/n' éder po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éger ègeras/n' éger po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 égler ègleras/n' égler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 égner ègneras/n' égner po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 égrer ègreras/n' égrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éguer ègueras/n' éguer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éler èleras/n' éler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 émer èmeras/n' émer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éner èneras/n' éner po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éper èperas/n' éper po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 équer èqueras/n' équer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 érer èreras/n' érer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éser èseras/n' éser po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éter èteras/n' éter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 étrer ètreras/n' étrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 évrer èvreras/n' évrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 éyer èyeras/n' éyer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c1 er era/n'q' er po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 ébrer èbrera/n'q' ébrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 écer ècera/n'q' écer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 écher èchera/n'q' écher po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 écrer ècrera/n'q' écrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éder èdera/n'q' éder po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éger ègera/n'q' éger po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 égler èglera/n'q' égler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 égner ègnera/n'q' égner po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 égrer ègrera/n'q' égrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éguer èguera/n'q' éguer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éler èlera/n'q' éler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 émer èmera/n'q' émer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éner ènera/n'q' éner po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éper èpera/n'q' éper po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 équer èquera/n'q' équer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 érer èrera/n'q' érer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éser èsera/n'q' éser po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éter ètera/n'q' éter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 étrer ètrera/n'q' étrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 évrer èvrera/n'q' évrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 éyer èyera/n'q' éyer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c1 er erons/n' er po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerons/n' ébrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c1 écer ècerons/n' écer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c1 écher ècherons/n' écher po:ifut po:1pl
